Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 20.1 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Attorney General shall, to the best of his or her ability,
take appropriate action, which shall include pursuing criminal and
civil actions against individuals, organizations, companies, and any
other entity that the Attorney General reasonably believes is
harming, disrupting, stopping or interfering with Oklahoma ranchers,
livestock production, and farmer and rancher property rights.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15542 JL 12/22/25

Req. No. 15542 Page 1